Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.110

Casualty insurance required—Certificate to be filed.

All commodities in storage in a warehouse shall be kept fully insured for the current market value of the commodity for the license period against loss by fire, lightning, internal explosion, windstorm, cyclone, and tornado. Evidence of the insurance coverage in the form of a certificate of insurance approved by the department shall be filed by the warehouse operator with the department at the time of making application for an annual license to operate a warehouse as required by this chapter. The department shall not issue a license until the certificate of insurance is received.

[ 2011 c 336 s 606; 1983 c 305 s 29; 1963 c 124 s 11.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 305: See note following RCW 20.01.010.